Arkansas, session 2025, HB1539.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Under the Arkansas Constitution, the General Assembly must
provide funding for an adequate and equitable education for every child in
the State of Arkansas;
(2) To provide an adequate and equitable education for every
child in the state, the General Assembly should adopt the recommendations
presented by the House Committee on Education and Senate Committee on
Education in the 2024 Educational Adequacy Study final report for funding
public schools in the upcoming biennium, except in the areas of special
education, staff pay, and mental health;
(3) Special education funding should be increased and moved from
foundation funding to categorical funding;
(4) Special education is underfunded by the state according to
*TNL202*
02/20/2025 9:29:56 AM TNL202

HB1539
the 2024 Educational Adequacy Study, with seventy-two percent (72%) of
superintendents reporting that their school districts are in moderate or
extreme need of more funding for special education teachers;
(5) Special education funds are currently allocated by the
number of students in a school district rather than the number of students
with special needs in a school district, leading to a mismatch of funds;
(6) Special education funds are part of foundation funding,
meaning they do not currently have to be spent on special education, but if
they were categorical funds, they would have to be spent on only special
education;
(7) Public school classified staff members should get a real
raise;
(8) Public school classified staff members are vital members of
a learning community and are often underpaid;
(9) Inadequate pay for public school classified staff members
negatively impacts a public school district's ability to recruit and retain
quality public school classified staff members, which negatively impacts the
student experience, school morale, and educational outcomes;
(10)(A) In 2023, the General Assembly approved foundation
funding, including what the biennial matrix called a “$2 salary increase”,
for public school classified staff members.
(B) Despite approving a salary increase, there was enough
money allocated for only five and four-tenths (5.4) full-time equivalent
classified staff members per five hundred (500) students, whereas there are
actually twenty-nine and eight-tenths (29.8) full-time equivalent public
school classified staff members per five hundred (500) students in Arkansas
public schools, meaning that the “$2 salary increase” was only a 30 cents
(30¢) per hour raise when spread among all full-time public school equivalent
classified staff members;
(11) The state should not only deliver on its previous promise
of funding a two dollars ($2.00) per hour raise for public school classified
staff members, but should catch up with inflation and deliver a four dollars
($4.00) per hour raise for public school classified staff members, ensuring
that the funding is there to pay every public school classified staff member
at least fifteen dollars ($15.00) per hour;
(12) Funding should be added for more counselors and social
02/20/2025 9:29:56 AM TNL202

HB1539
workers in public schools;
(13) Mental health is a statewide crisis, especially among
youth;
(14) Public school counselors perform many functions that
directly and indirectly impact youth mental health, but due to limited public
school district funds and a statewide counselor shortage, public school
counselors are often overworked and asked to perform functions outside their
intended responsibilities; and
(15) The state should provide sufficient funding for either two
(2) counselors per five hundred (500) students or one (1) counselor and one
(1) social worker per five hundred (500) students to improve counselor
working conditions and student outcomes.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-20-2305(a)(2), concerning per-student
foundation funding amounts under the Public School Funding Act of 2003, is
amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) For the 2023-2024 2025-2026 school year, the foundation
funding amount is equal to seven thousand six hundred eighteen dollars
($7,618) eight thousand one hundred sixty-five dollars ($8,165) multiplied by
the school district's average daily membership for the previous school year.
(B) For the 2024-2025 2026-2027 school year and each
school year thereafter, the foundation funding amount is equal to seven
thousand seven hundred seventy-one dollars ($7,771) eight thousand three
hundred sixty-one dollars ($8,361) multiplied by the school district's
average daily membership for the previous school year.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-20-2305(b)(2)(A), concernign alternative
learning environment funding under the Public School Funding Act of 2003, is
amended to read as follows:
(2)(A)(i) For the 2023-2024 2025-2026 school year, alternative
learning environment funding shall be four thousand nine hundred eighty-seven
dollars ($4,987) five thousand two hundred twelve dollars ($5,212) multiplied
by the number of identified alternative learning environment students
enrolled during the previous school year.
(ii) For the 2024-2025 2026-2027 school year,
alternative learning environment funding shall be five thousand eighty-six
02/20/2025 9:29:56 AM TNL202

HB1539
dollars ($5,086) five thousand three hundred forty-one dollars ($5,341)
multiplied by the number of identified alternative learning environment
students enrolled during the previous school year.
(iii) Funding for students in alternative learning
environments shall be distributed based on rules promulgated by the State
Board of Education.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-20-2305(b)(3), concerning funding for
English learners under the Public School Funding Act of 2003, is amended to
read as follows:
(3)(A) For the 2023-2024 2025-2026 school year, funding for
students who are identified as English learners shall be three hundred sixty-
six dollars ($366) three hundred seventy-five dollars ($375) for each
identified English learner.
(B) Funding for English learners shall be distributed to
public school districts for students who have been identified as not
proficient in the English language based upon a state-approved English
proficiency assessment instrument.
(C) Funds allocated for English learners to public school
districts under this subchapter shall be expended only for eligible
activities as identified in current rules promulgated by the State Board of
Education and are a supplement to funding for national school lunch students
provided in subdivision (b)(4) of this section.
(D) For the 2024-2025 2026-2027 school year and each
school year thereafter, funding for students who are identified as English
learners shall be three hundred sixty-six dollars ($366) three hundred eight-
four dollars ($384) for each identified English learner.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 6-20-2305(b)(4)(A), concerning Enhanced
Student Achievement Funding under the Public School Funding Act of 2003, is
amended to read as follows:
(4)(A) Enhanced Student Achievement Funding for each identified
national school lunch student shall be as follows:
(i) For a public school district in which ninety
percent (90%) or more of the previous school year's enrolled students are
national school lunch students, the amount of per-student Enhanced Student
02/20/2025 9:29:56 AM TNL202

HB1539
Achievement Funding for the 2023-2024 2025-2026 school year is one thousand
six hundred thirteen dollars ($1,613) one thousand six hundred fifty-three
dollars ($1,653) and for the 2024-2025 2026-2027 school year is one thousand
six hundred thirteen dollars ($1,613) one thousand six hundred ninety-four
dollars ($1,694);
(ii) For a public school district in which at least
seventy percent (70%) but less than ninety percent (90%) of the previous
school year's enrolled students are national school lunch students, the
amount of per-student Enhanced Student Achievement Funding for the 2023-2024
2025-2026 school year is one thousand seventy-six dollars ($1,076) one
thousand one hundred and three ($1,103) and for the 2024-2025 2026-2027
school year is one thousand seventy-six dollars ($1,076) one thousand one
hundred thirty dollars ($1,130); and
(iii) For a public school district in which less than
seventy percent (70%) of the previous school year's enrolled students are
national school lunch students, the amount of per-student Enhanced Student
Achievement Funding for the 2023-2024 2025-2026 school year is five hundred
thirty-eight dollars ($538) five hundred fifty-one dollars ($551) and for the
2024-2025 2026-2027 school year is five hundred thirty-eight dollars ($538)
five hundred sixty-five dollars ($565).

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 6-20-2305(b)(5)(C)(i), concerning
professional development funding for professional learning communities under
the Public School Funding Act of 2003, is amended to read as follows:
(C)(i) For the 2023-2024 2025-2026 school year and each
school year thereafter, additional funding up to sixteen million five hundred
thousand dollars ($16,500,000) provided for professional development above
the amount in subdivision (b)(5)(A) of this section shall be used by the
Division of Elementary and Secondary Education for the development and
administration of professional learning communities for the benefit of public
school districts.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 6-20-2305(b)(6)(A), concerning the
statewide target average annual salary for teachers under the Public School
Funding Act of 2003, is amended to read as follows:
(6)(A)(i) Beginning with the 2021-2022 school year, for school
02/20/2025 9:29:56 AM TNL202

HB1539
districts identified by the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education as
having an average annual teacher salary below the statewide target average
annual salary, teacher salary equalization funding shall be equal to one
hundred eighty-five dollars ($185) multiplied by the average daily membership
of the school district for the previous school year.
(ii) For the 2023-2024 2025-2026 and 2024-2025 2026-
2027 school years, the statewide target average annual salary shall be fifty-
one thousand eight hundred twenty-two dollars ($51,822).
(iii) The House Committee on Education and the Senate
Committee on Education shall set jointly the statewide target average annual
salary for the 2025-2026 2027-2028 and 2026-2027 2028-2029 school years, and
each biennium thereafter, as part of the adequacy review process required
under § 10-3-2102.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 6-20-2305(b), concerning education
categories of funding in addition to state foundation funding aid, is amended
to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(7)(A) For the 2025-2026 school year and each school year
thereafter, special education funding shall be three thousand eight hundred
sixty-two dollars ($3,862) multiplied by the number of students who receive
special education and related services required by an individualized
education plan.
(B) Funding for students who receive special education and
related services required by an individualized education plan under
subdivision (b)(7)(A) of this section shall be distributed based on rules
promulgated by the state board.
(C) Funding for students who receive special education and
related services required by an individualized education plan shall not be
incorporated into the state foundation funding aid amount established under
subsection (a) of this section.






02/20/2025 9:29:56 AM TNL202